Utah, session 2026, SB166.
Section 1. Section 53-17-401 is amended to read:53-17-401. Local Public Safety and Firefighter Surviving Spouse Trust Fund.(1)There is created a private purpose trust fund entitled the "Local Public Safety and Firefighter Surviving Spouse Trust Fund."(2)The trust fund consists of:(a)fees established in Subsection 53-17-402(2)(a);(b)appropriations made to the fund by the Legislature, if any;(c)private donations and grants; and(d)other revenue received from other sources.(3)The department:(a)shall account for the receipt and expenditures of trust fund money; or(b)may enter into contract with a third-party administrator to administer the fund and account for the receipt and expenditure of trust fund money.(4)The trust fund shall earn interest.(5)The revenue and interest in the account, less actual administrative costs to the department, shall be used to lower fees paid by an employer under Section 53-17-201.(6)The board of trustees created in Section 53-17-402 may expend money from the trust fund:(a)as provided in Subsection 53-17-201(1); and(b)to reimburse an employer for any amount paid:(i)under Section 53-17-201 for:(A)premium costs; or(B)contribution into a health savings account; and(ii)on or after May 1, 2024, and before May 7, 2025; and(b)(c)for reasonable administrative costs that the department and the board of trustees incur in performing their duties for administering the trust fund.(7)Money deposited into the trust fund is irrevocable and is expended only for the purposes described in this chapter.(8)Assets of the trust fund are dedicated for the purposes established by statute and administrative rule.(9)Creditors of the board of trustees and of employers liable for the benefits paid under this chapter may not seize, attach, or otherwise obtain assets of the trust fund.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.